Georgia, session 2025_26, HB674.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 20-2-149.4 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to financial
literacy instruction and curriculum, is amended by adding a new subsection to read as
follows:
"(c)(1) No later than January 1, 2026, the State Board of Education shall adopt content
standards for instruction in financial literacy and money management to be completed by
students in grades four and five.
H. B. 674
- 1 -

LC 61 0166
(2) Beginning in the 2025-2026 school year, each local board of education shall provide
instruction in financial literacy and money management for students in grades four and
five, and such instruction may be incorporated into an existing course of study."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 674
- 2 -